Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.88.030

Prostitution.

(1) A person age eighteen or older is guilty of prostitution if such person engages or agrees or offers to engage in sexual conduct with another person in return for a fee.

(2) For purposes of this section, "sexual conduct" means "sexual intercourse" or "sexual contact," both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

(3) Prostitution is a misdemeanor.

[ 2020 c 331 s 4; 1988 c 145 s 16; 1979 ex.s. c 244 s 15; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.88.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 331 ss 4, 5, and 6: "Sections 4, 5, and 6 of this act take effect January 1, 2024." [ 2020 c 331 s 12.]

Finding—2020 c 331: See note following RCW 7.68.380.

Effective date—Savings—Application—1988 c 145: See notes following RCW 9A.44.010.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 244: See RCW 9A.44.902.